Maine, session 132, LD407.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13083-K, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Prohibition on use of aqueous film-forming foam. Beginning January 1, 2026, a
person may not discharge, test, store or otherwise use aqueous film-forming foam on any
property leased or owned by the authority. The provisions of this subsection do not apply
to actions performed in the course of the removal, abatement or remediation of aqueous
film-forming foam. For purposes of this subsection, "aqueous film-forming foam" means
a fire suppressant foam containing fluorinated surfactants intended for extinguishing
flammable liquid fires. The Department of Environmental Protection shall enforce this
subsection in accordance with Title 38, section 347-A.